nb: Guavakjøttfarge: Krem; Rosa; Rød; Hvit; Gul; Annet
sv: Färgat guavakött: Gräddvit; Rosa; Röd; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
fi: Guavan hedelmälihan väri: Kerma; Vaaleanpunainen; Punainen; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
zh-CN: 番石榴果肉颜色: 奶油色; 粉红色; 红色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
pl: Kolor miąższu guawy: Kremowy; Różowy; Czerwony; Biały; Żółty; Inny
sl-SI: Barva mesa gvajane: Kremna; Roza; Rdeča; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
th: สีเนื้อฝรั่ง: สีครีม; สีชมพู; สีแดง; สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Gvajavos minkštimo spalva: Kreminė; Rožinė; Raudona; Balta; Geltona; Kita
nl: Guave vruchtvlees kleur: Crème; Roze; Rood; Wit; Geel; Overig
cs: Barva dužniny guave: Krémová; Růžová; Červená; Bílá; Žlutá; Ostatní
en: Guava flesh color: Cream; Pink; Red; White; Yellow; Other
it: Colore della polpa di guava: Crema; Rosa; Rosso; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
fr: Couleur de la chair de la goyave: Crème; Rose; Rouge; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
da: Farve på guavafrugtkød: Creme; Pink; Rød; Hvid; Gul; Andet
zh-TW: 番石榴果肉顏色: 奶油色; 粉紅色; 紅色; 白色; 黃色; 其他
hr-HR: Boja mesa guave: Krem; Ružičasta; Crvena; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
ro-RO: Culoarea pulpei de guava: Crem; Roz; Roșu; Alb; Galben; Altele
vi: Màu thịt quả ổi: Màu kem; Màu hồng; Màu đỏ; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
ko: 구아바 과육 색상: 크림색; 분홍색; 빨간색; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
sk-SK: Farba dužiny guavy: Krémová; Ružová; Červená; Biela; Žltá; Iné
pt-BR: Goiaba cor da polpa: Creme; Rosa; Vermelha; Branca; Amarela; Outra
es: Color de la pulpa de la guayaba: Crema; Rosa; Rojo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
de: Farbe des Guavenfruchtfleischs: Cremefarben; Rosa; Rot; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstige
ja: グアバの果肉の色: クリーム; ピンク; 赤; 白; 黄色; その他
pt-PT: cor da polpa da goiaba: Creme; Cor-de-rosa; Vermelha; Branca; Amarela; Outra
ru: Цвет мякоти гуавы: Кремовый; Розовый; Красный; Белый; Желтый; Другое
bg-BG: Цвят на месестата част на гуавата: Кремав; Розов; Червен; Бял; Жълт; Други
el: Χρώμα σάρκας γκουάβα: Κρεμ; Ροζ; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
hu: Guava hús színe: Krém; Rózsaszín; Piros; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
tr: Guava meyve eti rengi: Krem; Pembe; Kırmızı; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer